Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0829.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR ENDING SEPTEMBER 30, 2026 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for certain capital outlay 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 projects for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated classified positions 0.0 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 45,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 45,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 45,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 102. MICHIGAN NATURAL RESOURCES TRUST FUND (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 45,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 45,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total other state restricted revenues 45,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) MICHIGAN NATURAL RESOURCES TRUST FUND Trust fund acquisition projects by priority: Black River Access Acquisition (grant-in-aid to Kimball Township) (#25-0013) $ 175,000 Lincoln Brick Park Expansion, Eaton County (grant-in-aid to Eaton County)(#25-0080) 220,200 Petty's Bayou Waterfront Acquisition, Ottawa County (grant-in-aid to Spring Lake Township) (#25-0071) 840,000 Keweenaw Heartlands Acquisition, Keweenaw County (#25-0122) 6,500,000 Mill Creek Waterfront Acquisition, St. Clair County (grant-in-aid to City of Yale) (#25-0127) 174,000 Riverside Park Acquisition, Allegan County (grant-in-aid to Saugatuck Township) (#25-0037) 2,464,300 Railroad Parcel Acquisitions, Ingham County (grant-in-aid to City of Lansing) (#25-0025) 400,000 Ridge Nature Preserve Acquisition, Grand Traverse County (grant-in-aid to East Bay Township) (#25-0094) 4,813,600 Elmdale to Lowell Trail Acquisition, Kent County (#25-0128) 1,000,000 George & Woody Park Land Acquisition, Macomb County (grant-in-aid to Clinton Township) (#25-0171) 280,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Muskegon State Game Area Land Consolidation, Newaygo County (#25-0174) 1,600,000 Turtle Lake Acquisition, Otsego County (#24-0222) 5,000,000 Porcupine Mountain State Park Addition, Gogebic County (#25-0143) 1,500,000 Joe Louis Greenway - Salsinger Trailhead, Wayne County (grant-in-aid to City of Detroit) (#25-0046) 168,700 Hartshorn Marina Expansion, Muskegon County (grant-in-aid to City of Muskegon) (#25-0221) 730,200 Trust fund development projects by priority: Parker Mill Park & B2B Trail Accessibility Improvements, Washtenaw County (grant-in-aid to Washtenaw County) (#25-0091) $ 400,000 Marshall Riverwalk Improvements, Calhoun County (grant-in-aid to City of Marshall) (#25-0072) 200,000 Lakelands Trail Zukey Lake Footbridge Renovation, Livingston County (grant-in-aid to Hamburg Township) (#25-0213) 100,000 Van Raalte Farm Park Boardwalk Project, Ottawa County (grant-in-aid to City of Holland) (#25-0051) 400,000 Rosy Mound Natural Area Improvements, Ottawa County (grant-in-aid to Ottawa County) (#25-0079) 400,000 Old Riverwoods Boardwalk Improvements, Van Buren County (grant-in-aid to South Haven Area Recreation Authority) (#25-0020) 400,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 St. Mary's Park Redevelopment, Monroe County (grant-in-aid to City of Monroe) (#25-0085) 400,000 Extension of the Three Mile Trail, Grand Traverse County (grant-in-aid to East Bay Township) (#25-0095) 400,000 White Pine Trail Heritage and Signage Project, Wexford County (#25-0106) 280,000 Stepping Stone Falls Lot Improvements, Genesee County (grant-in-aid to Genesee County) (#25-0027) 125,000 Belleville Lake West Boating Access Site Redevelopment, Wayne County (#25-0078) 350,000 Clemente Park Inclusive Play Area, Wayne County (grant-in-aid to City of Detroit) (#25-0154) 400,000 Big Rapids Clay Cliffs Nature Area Trail Project, Mecosta County (grant-in-aid to City of Big Rapids) (#25-0043) 391,400 Zilwaukee Township Saginaw River Park Development, Saginaw County (grant-in-aid to Zilwaukee Township) (#25-0087) 197,900 Rogue River Park South Kayak Landing, Kent County (grant-in-aid to Village of Sparta) (#25-0107) 275,000 Meridian Regional Trailhead, Ingham County (grant-in-aid to Meridian Township) (#25-0126) 349,600 M-72 East Trail - Rayburn Connector, Crawford County (grant-in-aid to City of Grayling) (#25-0175) 400,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Riverfront Park Improvements, Allegan County (grant-in-aid to City of Otsego) (#25-0089) 400,000 VASA Trailhead Improvements, Grand Traverse County (grant-in-aid to Grand Traverse County) (#25-0132) 400,000 Cherry Bend Multi-Use Trail Project, Leelanau County (grant-in-aid to Elmwood Township) (#25-0058) 400,000 Bliss Park Improvements, Saginaw County (grant-in-aid to City of Saginaw) (#25-0086) 400,000 Blue Star Trail Expansion, Allegan County (grant-in-aid to City of Village of Douglas) (#25-0121) 215,000 Paving the Betsie Valley Trail, Benzie County (grant-in-aid to Village of Thompsonville) (#25-0104) 299,100 Riverfront Park Improvements, Berrien County (grant-in-aid to City of Buchanan) (#25-0123) 385,000 Oscoda Beach Park Restrooms/Showers Building, Iosco County (grant-in-aid to Oscoda Township) (#25-0162) 400,000 Cullen Field Improvement Project, Muskegon County (grant-in-aid to City of Montague) (#25-0166) 400,000 Lake Alliance Park Improvements, Eaton County (grant-in-aid to City of Potterville) (#25-0009) 267,600 Bush Park Improvements, Genesee County (grant-in-aid to City of Fenton) (#25-0124) 400,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Idema Explorers Trail - Bass River Segment, Ottawa County (grant-in-aid to Ottawa County) (#25-0139) 400,000 North Bay Park Pavilion, Washtenaw County (grant-in-aid to Ypsilanti Township) (#25-0157) 308,600 Cedar Run Creek Natural Area Improvements, Grand Traverse County (grant-in-aid to Long Lake Township) (#25-0034) 133,200 Copper Harbor State Harbor Seawall and Binwall Upgrade, Keweenaw County (#25-0075) 400,000 Sanford Lake Park Renovations, Midland County (grant-in-aid to Midland County) (#25-0149) 400,000 Lincoln Township Beach Bathroom, Berrien County (grant-in-aid to Lincoln Township) (#25-0163) 400,000 Kerri Mertaugh Multi-Use Path, Mackinac County (grant-in-aid to Clark Township) (#25-0081) 296,000 Sanborn Park Restrooms, St. Clair County (grant-in-aid to City of Port Huron) (#25-0083) 250,000 Expansion of the Blue Star Trail, Allegan County (grant-in-aid to Saugatuck Township) (#25-0088) 400,000 Nature Center Development Project, Ottawa County (grant-in-aid to City of Hudsonville) (#25-0093) 400,000 Bessemer Iron Belle Trailhead Development, Gogebic County (grant-in-aid to City of Bessemer) (#25-0022) 227,800 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Cannonsburg Rd. Non-Motorized Path, Kent County (grant-in-aid to Cannon Township) (#25-0179) 400,000 Tamarack Lake Trail Loop, Montcalm County (grant-in-aid to Village of Lakeview) (#25-0077) 400,000 Imlay City Polly Ann Trailhead Improvements, Lapeer County (grant-in-aid to City of Imlay City) (#25-0130) 400,000 Overlook Deck-Accessibility Project-Riverside Park Pavilion, Gratiot County (grant-in-aid to City of Alma) (#25-0191) 340,400 McConnell Park Improvements, Ionia County (grant-in-aid to City of Ionia) (#25-0070) 400,000 Cros-Lex Trail Revitalization, Sanilac County (grant-in-aid to Lexington Township) (#25-0142) 240,900 Lake Harbor Park Splash Pad, Muskegon County (grant-in-aid to City of Norton Shores) (#25-0189) 190,500 Dawson Lake Park Improvements, Iron County (grant-in-aid to Mansfield Township) (#25-0031) 289,800 Pamona Park Shoreline Access and Trail Development, Muskegon County (grant-in-aid to Village of Fruitport) (#25-0032) 400,000 Blue Heron Environmental Area Trail Development, Oakland County (grant-in-aid to Oakland Township) (#25-0064) 400,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Veronica Valley Lower Pond Trail Improvements, Leelanau County (grant-in-aid to Leelanau County) (#25-0073) 50,000 Lakeside Park Accessible Play Features, St. Clair County (grant-in-aid to City of Port Huron) (#25-0084) 250,000 Lathrup Village Municipal Park Playground Replacement, Oakland County (grant-in-aid to City of Lathrup Village) (#25-0090) 400,000 Central Park Redevelopment, Ottawa County (grant-in-aid to Village of Spring Lake) (#25-0181) 400,000 Knox Park Development, St. Clair County (grant-in-aid to City of Port Huron) (#25-0082) 250,000 Barry Shooting Range Development, Barry County (#25-0120) 200,000 Echo Point Shooting Range Development, Allegan County (#25-0178) 200,000 Elizabeth Neighborhood Park Development, Oakland County (grant-in-aid to City of Rochester) (#25-0167) 375,000 Grass Lake Development Project, Muskegon County (grant-in-aid to Blue Lake Township) (#25-0096) 90,000 Holiday Woodlands Trail Development, Grand Traverse County (grant-in-aid to East Bay Township) (#25-0138) 300,000 Sturgeon River Launch Project, Houghton County (grant-in-aid to Chassell Township) (#25-0190) 106,200 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 45,000,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Michigan natural resources trust fund 45,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations for fiscal year ENDING SEPTEMBER 30, 2026 general sections Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $45,000,000.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $27,970,000.00. The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from which spending to local units of government will occur: Acquisition grants-in-aid $ 10,266,000 Development grants-in-aid 17,704,000 Total payments to locals $ 27,970,000 Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. MICHIGAN NATURAL RESOURCES TRUST FUND Sec. 301. (1) The department of natural resources shall enter into agreements with local units of government to administer the grants identified in part 1. Among other provisions, the agreements must require that grant recipients do all of the following: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (a) Dedicate to public outdoor recreation uses in perpetuity the land acquired or developed. (b) Replace lands converted or lost to other than public outdoor recreation use. (c) For parcels acquired that are larger than 5 acres, provide this state with a nonparticipating 1/6 minimum royalty interest in any acquired minerals that are retained by the grant recipient. (2) The agreements under subsection (1) must also provide that the full payments of grants be made only after proof of acquisition, or proof of completion of a development project, is submitted by the grant recipient and all costs are verified by the department of natural resources. This requirement may be waived by the department of natural resources. Sec. 302. The appropriations in part 1 for capital outlay shall be carried forward at the end of the fiscal year consistent with section 248 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1248. Sec. 303. (1) The state share of the capital outlay appropriations authorized in 2024 PA 135 for the following Michigan natural resources trust fund projects that have since been withdrawn by the grantee is reduced up to the amount indicated and the money lapsed to the Michigan natural resources trust fund: Sycamore Creek Land Acquisition Cavanaugh Road, Ingham County (grant-in-aid to City of Lansing) (#23-0032) $ 300,000 Rogue River State Game Area Land Acquisition, Kent County (#23-0166) 1,200,000 (2) Any money lapsed under subsection (1) is available for reappropriation.